Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Investment Fund

154.20-250.
Purpose of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284.

The purposes of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 are to encourage capital investment in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, to encourage the establishment or expansion of small businesses in Kentucky, to provide additional jobs, and to encourage the development of new products and technologies in the state through capital investments. It is the intent of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 to give investment preference to Kentucky small businesses showing a potential for rapid growth. Insofar as possible, any investment made in a Kentucky small business under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall be used by that business to leverage additional capital investments from other sources.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 171, § 97, effective April 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 62, effective June 27, 2019.

154.20-253.
Definitions for KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284. [Repealed.]

154.20-254.
Definitions for KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284.

As used in KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Affiliate” means any person or entity who directly or indirectly, through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by or is under common control with another person or entity;

“Agreement” means an investment fund agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.20-255(5) by the authority and an investment fund manager on behalf of the investment fund, the investment fund manager, and any investor in the investment fund;

“Amended application” means a document submitted by an investment fund manager, in a form acceptable to the authority and on behalf of an investment fund, for the purpose of increasing the aggregate amount of available tax credits;

“Applicant” means any person or entity who has not received approval from the authority as an investment fund manager, but who has submitted or will submit an application to the authority for approval as an investment fund manager;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority or its designee;

“Cash contribution” means an investment of money by an investor in an investment fund under the terms of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284;

“Committed cash contribution” means a legally binding agreement by an investor to make a cash contribution in an amount set forth in a written agreement between an investor and an investment fund;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Credit” means a nonrefundable credit for investors against state tax liability allocated and granted by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-258 for qualified investments made by approved investment funds;

“Entity” means any corporation, limited liability company, business development corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional service organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted;

“Financial institution” means “financial institution” as defined in KRS 136.500(10) and includes savings and loan associations, savings banks, and similar institutions subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.290, 136.300, or 136.310;

“Insurance company” means any insurance company subject to the taxes imposed by KRS 136.320, 136.330, or 304.3-270;

“Investment fund” means any entity that is organized by an investment fund manager in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations, and is approved by the authority to make qualified investments pursuant to KRS 154.20-256;

“Investment fund manager” means any person or entity that has been approved by the authority to manage one (1) or more investment funds authorized under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and is in compliance with all applicable federal and state regulations;

“Investor” means any person or entity, including financial institutions and insurance companies, that is subject to state tax liability and that makes a cash contribution or a committed cash contribution to an investment fund in accordance with the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and has not been convicted of violating any of Kentucky’s tax laws within the past ten (10) years;

“Knowledge-based” has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;

“Nonprofit entity” means an investor that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

“Qualified activity” has the same meaning as in 154.20-230;

“Qualified investment” means an investment of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in a small business by an investment fund, in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations, seeking a financial return based upon that consideration. In consideration for the qualified investment, the investment fund shall receive an equity interest in the small business, such as a general or limited partnership interest, common or preferred stock with or without voting rights and without regard to seniority position, forms of subordinate or convertible unsecured debt, or both, with warrants, rights, or other means of equity conversion attached; and

“Small business” means any entity which at the time a qualified investment is made by an investment fund:

Has a net worth of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less or net income after federal income taxes for each of the two (2) preceding fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less; or
(a) 1.

Has a net worth of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less or net income after federal income taxes for each of the two (2) preceding fiscal years of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less; or

Is a knowledge-based business, as shall be prescribed by the commissioner of the Department of Commercialization and Innovation, and has a net worth of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less;

Is actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth, or will be actively and principally engaged in a qualified activity within the Commonwealth after the receipt of a qualified investment by an investment fund;

Has no more than one hundred (100) employees; and

Has more than fifty percent (50%) of its assets, operations, and employees located in Kentucky.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 17, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 181, § 13, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 215, July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 210, § 9, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 185, § 112, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-255.
Tax credits available to investment fund — Application for approval as manager — Requirements for investment fund — Agreement — Total qualified investments made by fund.

The total amount of credits available to any single investment fund awarded credits under KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall not exceed, in aggregate:
(1) (a)

The total amount of credits available to any single investment fund awarded credits under KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall not exceed, in aggregate:

For any calendar year beginning prior to January 1, 2022, eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for all investors and all taxable years; and

In any calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, one million dollars ($1,000,000).

The total credit available for all investors in all investment funds awarded under KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall not exceed a total of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in any calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2021.

A person or entity seeking to be approved as an investment fund manager for the operation of one (1) or more investment funds shall make written application to the authority pursuant to KRS 154.20-256, in addition to complying with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations.

Prior to the granting of any tax credits to investors of an investment fund, the committed cash contributions to an investment fund shall be not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

An investment fund shall have no less than four (4) investors, and no investor or investment fund manager, including their closely related family members, and affiliates may own or have a capital interest in more than forty percent (40%) of the investment fund’s capitalization.
(4) (a)

An investment fund shall have no less than four (4) investors, and no investor or investment fund manager, including their closely related family members, and affiliates may own or have a capital interest in more than forty percent (40%) of the investment fund’s capitalization.

As used in this subsection, “closely related” means any of the following in relation to the investor, the investor’s spouse, the fund manager, or the fund manager’s spouse:

Parents or grandparents;

Children or their spouses; or

Siblings or their spouses.

Subsequent to approval of the investment fund and the investment fund manager, the authority and the investment fund manager, on behalf of itself and any investors in the investment fund, shall enter into an agreement with respect to the investment fund. The terms and provisions of each agreement shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the investment fund manager. The effective date of the agreement shall be the date of approval of the investment fund and the investment fund manager by the authority. If an investment fund manager fails to comply with any of the obligations of the agreement, the authority may, at its option, do any one (1) or more of the following:

Suspend the availability of the credits;

Pursue any remedy provided under the agreement, including termination of the agreement; or

Pursue any other remedy at law to which it may be entitled.

Any investor shall be entitled to a tax credit as a result of its investment in an investment fund as provided in KRS 154.20-258.

Total qualified investments made by an investment fund, including initial and subsequent investments made by an investment fund, in any single small business using approved qualified investments, shall not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the committed cash contributions to the investment fund. This restriction shall not apply to investments of money by the investment fund that are not qualified investments.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit an investment fund from investing in a business that is not a small business, including a business that is located outside of the Commonwealth; however, such investments shall not be eligible for the tax credit set forth in KRS 154.20-258.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 18, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 102, § 27, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 80, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 207, § 99, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 113, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-256.
Approval of investment funds and managers — Application — Documents — Powers of authority — Purpose of investment fund — Criteria for approval — Disclosure form — Operation of multiple funds — Loss of unused credits — Confidentiality — Standards.

The approval of investment funds and investment fund managers shall be made pursuant to an application to the authority submitted by a proposed fund manager on behalf of a proposed investment fund and shall include:

The name, address, and Social Security number or employer identification number, as applicable, of the investment fund manager and the investment fund;

The applicant’s business plan, including the minimum and maximum amount of cash contributions to be solicited for the investment fund, and strategy for operation of the proposed investment fund;

The amount of credits the investment fund seeks for making qualified investments;

The applicant fund manager’s relevant experience and demonstrated ability to manage the proposed investment fund;

The location and account number of a bank account that has been established for use by the investment fund;

The exemption or registration provision that is being relied upon or intended to be relied upon by both the investment fund and the investment fund manager to permit this offering of securities and the activity of the investment fund manager in relation to the offering, in compliance with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations;

A representation that the investment fund and the investment fund manager are and shall remain in compliance with applicable state and federal securities regulations; and

Any additional information the authority deems necessary.

The applicant shall include copies of the following documents as attachments to the application:

The disclosure documents used in connection with the offering and investment in the investment fund;

The disclosure documents provided to each investor which state that:

The investor has certain rights, responsibilities, and liabilities pursuant to KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284;

The Commonwealth shall be immune from liability for any losses or damages investors, investment funds, or investment fund managers may incur pursuant to KRS 154.20-279;

No tax credit shall be available under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 until the investment fund and the investment fund manager have complied with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations and have been approved by the authority, and an agreement has been executed, and the terms of that agreement have been disclosed in writing to each investor; and

Investors shall lose all rights to any unused credits allocated to an investment fund that does not make a qualified investment within one (1) year of the date of the agreement with the authority or within any one (1) year period thereafter through the end of the term of the agreement.

The authority shall have, in addition to its other powers provided in this chapter and as otherwise provided by law, all powers and authority, not explicitly prohibited by statute, that are necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes, objectives, and provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, including but not limited to power to:

Require consultation, advisory, and legal fees and other expenses the authority deems necessary or incident to the preparation, adoption, implementation, modification, or enforcement of the terms of any agreement or other document, or otherwise necessary or incident to any transaction;

Require the investment fund manager to pay these fees and expenses directly to the person providing such consultation, advisory, legal, or other services on behalf of the authority; and

Impose and collect fees and charges in connection with any transaction and provide for reasonable penalties for delinquent payment of fees or charges.

An investment fund’s stated purpose shall be primarily to encourage and assist in the creation, development, or expansion of small businesses located in Kentucky.

The criteria considered by the authority for the approval of investment fund managers and the maximum amount of credits allocated to the investors of an investment fund shall include but not be limited to:

Compliance by those persons with applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations;

A review of the application;

The investment strategy for the investment fund;

The relevant experience of the applicant fund manager or, if the applicant fund manager is an entity, the applicant’s management;

The applicant’s demonstrated ability to manage the investment fund; and

The amount of credits requested by the investment fund and the total amount of credits which may be granted to investors under KRS 154.20-258.

Following the making of a qualified investment, the investment fund manager shall within eighty (80) days file a disclosure form with the authority detailing the following information:

The name and address of the small business in which the qualified investment was made;

The amount of the qualified investment; and

The name, address, and Social Security number or employer identification number, as may be applicable, of each investor and the amount of credit allocated to each investor by virtue of the investor’s proportional ownership interest in the qualified investment.

An investment fund manager and its affiliates may operate no more than three (3) separate investment funds pursuant to separate applications submitted to and approved by the authority, provided the investment fund manager is in compliance with any applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations as evidenced by a written statement to the authority by an investment fund manager to that effect.

An investment fund manager seeking to expand a previously approved investment fund shall submit to the authority an amended application in a form acceptable to the authority.

An investment fund shall lose all unused credits that are available to its investors if the investment fund does not make a qualified investment within one (1) year of the date of the agreement or within any one (1) year period thereafter through the end of the term of the agreement.

The contents of the information form required under subsections (1), (2), and (6) of this section shall be treated by the authority and by the Department of Revenue as confidential and shall not be considered public records under KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

The authority, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, may establish additional procedures and standards, as it deems necessary for the approval of investment funds and investment fund managers, and for the allocation and granting of investment tax credits by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

An applicant soliciting cash contributions for the initial capitalization of an investment fund, or an investment fund manager soliciting additional cash contributions for an approved investment fund, shall disclose in advance and in writing to each potential investor those items described in this subsection in addition to any other items required by law or by agreement.

Any payments made by an investment fund manager pursuant to this subsection may be passed on to the investment fund manager’s investment fund.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 19, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 570, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 185, § 114, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-257.
Approval of investment funds, cash contributions, and investment fund managers — Tax credits authorized by KRS 154.20-263 — Agreement between authority and investment fund manager — Transfer of funds — Schedule for investment — Prohibition against awarding of tax credits and approval of investment funds or investment fund managers after specific dates. [Repealed.]

154.20-258.
Investor entitled to credit — Amount — Carry-forward — Liabilities — Transferability — Notification of Department of Revenue — Additional credits.

For qualified investments made prior to January 1, 2022, an investor shall be entitled to a nonrefundable credit equal to forty percent (40%) of the investor’s proportional ownership share of all qualified investments made by its investment fund and verified by the authority. The aggregate tax credit available to any investor shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of the cash contribution made by the investor to its investment fund.
(1) (a)

For qualified investments made prior to January 1, 2022, an investor shall be entitled to a nonrefundable credit equal to forty percent (40%) of the investor’s proportional ownership share of all qualified investments made by its investment fund and verified by the authority. The aggregate tax credit available to any investor shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of the cash contribution made by the investor to its investment fund.

For qualified investments made on or after January 1, 2022, an investor shall be entitled to a nonrefundable credit not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the investor’s proportional ownership share of all qualified investments made by its investment fund and verified by the authority.

The credit may be applied against:

Both the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with the ordering of the credits as provided in KRS 141.0205;

The insurance taxes imposed by KRS 136.320, 136.330, and 304.3-270; and

The taxes on financial institutions imposed by KRS 136.300, 136.310, and 136.505.

The tax credit amount that may be claimed by an investor in any tax year shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the initial aggregate credit amount approved by the authority for the investment fund which would be proportionally available to the investor. An investor may first claim the credit granted in subsection (1) of this section in the year following the year in which the credit is granted.

If the credit amount that may be claimed in any tax year, as determined under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, exceeds the investor’s combined tax liabilities against which the credit may be claimed for that year, the investor may carry the excess tax credit forward until the tax credit is used, but the carry-forward of any excess tax credit shall not increase the fifty percent (50%) limitation established by subsection (2) of this section. Any tax credits not used within fifteen (15) years of the approval by the authority of the aggregate tax credit amount available to the investor shall be lost.

The tax credits allowed by this section shall not apply to any liability an investor may have for interest, penalties, past due taxes, or any other additions to the investor’s tax liability. The holder of the tax credit shall assume any and all liabilities and responsibilities of the credit.

The tax credits allowed by this section are not transferable, except that:

A nonprofit entity may transfer, for some or no consideration, any or all of the credits it receives under this section and any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and liabilities. Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of credits pursuant to this subsection, the nonprofit entity shall notify the authority and the Department of Revenue of:

The name, address, and Social Security number or employer identification number, as may be applicable, of the party to which the nonprofit entity transferred its credits;

The amount of credits transferred; and

Any additional information the authority or the Department of Revenue deems necessary.

If an investor is an entity and is a party to a merger, acquisition, consolidation, dissolution, liquidation, or similar corporate reorganization, the tax credits shall pass through to the investor’s successor.

If an individual investor dies, the tax credits shall pass to the investor’s estate or beneficiaries in a manner consistent with the transfer of ownership of the investor’s interest in the investment fund.

The tax credit amount that may be claimed by an investor shall reflect only the investor’s participation in qualified investments properly reported to the authority by the investment fund manager. No tax credit authorized by this section shall become effective until the Department of Revenue receives notification from the authority that includes:

A statement that a qualified investment has been made that is in compliance with KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and all applicable regulations; and

A list of each investor in the investment fund that owns a portion of the small business in which a qualified investment has been made by virtue of an investment in the investment fund, and each investor’s amount of credit granted to the investor for each qualified investment.

After the date on which investors in an investment fund have cumulatively received an amount of credits equal to the amount of credits allocated to the investment fund by the authority, no investor shall receive additional credits by virtue of its investment in that investment fund unless the investment fund’s allocation of credits is increased by the authority pursuant to an amended application.

The authority shall, within sixty (60) days of approval of credits, notify the Department of Revenue of the information required pursuant to this subsection and notify each investor of the amount of credits granted to that investor, and the year the credits may first be claimed.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 20, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 571, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 42, effective June 28, 2006; 2019 ch. 151, § 63, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 185, § 115, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-259.
Information that applicant must disclose to authority in application — Confidentiality of applications — Power of authority — Purpose of investment funds — Criteria for approval of investment fund managers — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

154.20-260.
Claim of credit on tax return — Confidentiality.

To receive the credit provided by KRS 154.20-258, an investor shall claim the credit on the investor’s annual state tax returns in the manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue.

The contents of an investor’s filings under subsection (1) of this section shall be treated by the authority and by the Department of Revenue as confidential and shall not be considered public records under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 21, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 572, effective June 20, 2005.

154.20-261.
Fund manager’s business office — Initial capitalization, qualified investments, and other regulations governing fund — Written disclosure to investors required — Limitation of Commonwealth’s liability. [Repealed.]

154.20-262.
Penalties and interest — Liability of investors — Powers and duties of Department of Revenue.

An investment fund that violates the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall pay to the State Treasurer a penalty in an amount equal to the amount of all credits claimed by the investors when these credits are determined to be derived from unqualified investments, plus interest at the rate of two percent (2%) per month, compounded monthly, from the date the credits were taken. If the investment fund fails to pay the penalty and interest in full as required by the Department of Revenue, each investor shall be personally liable to the Department of Revenue for that investor’s share of the unpaid penalty, which shall be determined by the amount of credits received and utilized by the investor and all applicable interest. Any payment of unpaid penalty by an investor shall be included with the investor’s state tax return for the period in which the failure or violation occurred. The commissioner of the Department of Revenue shall give notice in writing to the authority, the investment fund manager, and the investors of any penalties imposed. The commissioner of the Department of Revenue may abate any imposed penalty upon written request, if the investment fund manager establishes reasonable cause for the failure to make qualified investments in small businesses under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, or to otherwise comply with the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284. The State Treasurer shall deposit any amounts received pursuant to this section in the Commonwealth’s general fund.

The administration of this section shall be the responsibility of the Department of Revenue.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 22, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 573, effective June 20, 2005.

154.20-263.
Investor entitled to nonrefundable tax credit against income tax or corporation license tax — Authority to carry excess tax credit forward — Tax credits not transferable and not applicable to interest, penalties, or other additions to investor’s tax liability. [Repealed.]

154.20-264.
Annual report by investment fund manager — Status report by authority — Confidentiality — Fee.

Each investment fund manager shall file an annual report with the commissioner of the Department of Revenue and with the authority, on or before February 15 of each year during which it manages an investment fund. This report shall include information that the authority prescribes from time to time, including but not limited to the following:

For each small business in which qualified investments are made by the investment fund during the reporting period, the name and address of the small business, the amount of qualified investments made by the investment fund, the job creation anticipated and achieved by the small business, and new products and technologies being developed by the small business;

An affidavit prepared by the investment fund manager or, if the investment fund is an entity, by an authorized officer, partner, trustee, member, or manager of the investment fund management firm that states:

At the time of each qualified investment, each small business qualifies as a small business under the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284;

The name and address of each investor, and the amount of cash contribution to the investment fund of each investor who is entitled to the credits; and

The continued compliance by the investment fund and the investment fund manager with all applicable state and federal securities laws and regulations.

The authority shall provide an annual written status report to the standing Appropriations and Revenue Committee of each house or to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, as appropriate, concerning the activities of the Kentucky investment fund for each fiscal year beginning with the fiscal year ended July 30, 2003. On or before November 1 of each year, the authority shall make an annual report for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.The annual report shall include but not be limited to the following information:

The total number of investors and the aggregate amount of committed cash contributions to all investment funds, categorized by the types of business entities through which investors conduct business and the geographical distribution of investors, including the area development districts;

The total number and amounts of qualified investments made by each investment fund to qualified small businesses, categorized by type of businesses, amount of investment, job creation anticipated and achieved, geographical distribution, including area development districts, and new products and technologies developed; and

The total amount of credits granted to investors.

The contents of the annual reports from investment fund managers to the authority described in subsection (1) of this section shall be treated by the authority as confidential, and shall not be considered a public record under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

The authority may charge a fee in connection with the administration and processing of an annual report made by an investment fund manager.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 23, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 574, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

154.20-265.
Investment fund approved before July 1, 2002.

Any investment fund approved to make qualified investments pursuant to KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 prior to July 1, 2002, unless otherwise approved by the authority, shall continue to operate and be granted credits pursuant to the agreement entered into and the rules, regulations, and procedures adopted by the authority prior to July 15, 2002.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 24, effective July 15, 2002.

154.20-267.
Limitations on total amount of tax credits — Order in which authority approves credits to investors. [Repealed.]

154.20-269.
Procedure for obtaining tax credit — Confidentiality of investor’s filings. [Repealed.]

154.20-271.
Disallowance of cash contributions redeemed or withdrawn — Penalty for failure to invest in small businesses and abatement of penalty — Personal liability of investors to Revenue Cabinet — Administration by Revenue Cabinet. [Repealed.]

154.20-273.
Investment fund manager’s reports to Revenue Cabinet and to authority, content and time of filing — Authority’s status reports to General Assembly, content and time of filing — Confidentiality of reports from investment fund managers to the authority — Fees. [Repealed.]

154.20-277.
Annual examination of investment funds by authority and Department of Revenue — Other audits — Department’s powers of enforcement — Notice of noncompliance — Examination, investigative, and enforcement powers of securities regulatory organizations.

Each year the annual financial statements and annual reports of the investment fund shall be delivered to the authority within ninety (90) days after the end of the investment fund’s fiscal year.

The authority and the Department of Revenue, individually or collectively, may examine, under oath, any of the officers, trustees, partners, members, managers, directors, agents, employees, or investors of an investment fund regarding the affairs and business of the investment fund. The authority and the Department of Revenue, individually or collectively, may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum and administer oaths. Refusal to obey such a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum may be reported to the Franklin Circuit Court, which shall enforce the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum according to the rules of civil or criminal procedure, as applicable.

In addition to the audits required by this section, the authority or the Department of Revenue may audit one (1) or more investment funds or investment fund managers in any year on a random basis or for cause. The authority or the Department of Revenue may also audit, for cause, any small business in which an investment fund has made a qualified investment. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Department of Revenue from conducting any audit relating to the administration or enforcement of the tax laws of the Commonwealth which the Department of Revenue determines to be appropriate.

If any audit conducted pursuant to this section discloses that an investment fund or investment fund manager is not in compliance with the provisions of KRS 141.068 and KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, the authority and the Department of Revenue may consult with one another with respect to this noncompliance and the Department of Revenue may exercise any of its powers to protect the Commonwealth’s interest and to enforce the provisions of KRS 141.068 and KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284.

The authority may give an investment fund manager written notice of any noncompliance with the provisions of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 and specify a period of time the investment fund manager shall have to cure any noncompliance. Failure to cure any such noncompliance within the period of time specified by the authority may result in further action by the authority pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Department of Financial Institutions, Division of Securities, or any other securities regulatory organization or body with jurisdiction over the activity of an investment fund or the investment fund manager from conducting any examination or investigation relating to the securities activities of the investment fund or investment fund manager. If any examination or investigation conducted pursuant to any securities laws or regulations discloses that an investment fund or investment fund manager is not in compliance with any provision of any applicable securities laws or regulations, the appropriate securities regulator may take whatever action it deems appropriate in accordance with such securities laws and regulations to respond to the noncompliance, notwithstanding any action the authority or the Department of Revenue may or may not take with respect to the noncompliance.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 230, § 25, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 575, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 197, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 185, § 116, effective June 29, 2021.

154.20-279.
Limitation of liability for the Commonwealth and its agents.

The Commonwealth, the authority, or any officer, director, official, employee, or agent of the Commonwealth or the authority shall not be liable to any investor, investment fund, or investment fund manager as a result of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284, or any of the activities authorized by KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284. This limitation of liability includes, without limitation:

Losses or damages investors incur in connection with any committed or contributed cash contributions made to an investment fund or any qualified investments made by an investment fund in small businesses; and

Any claim, liability, obligation, loss, damage, assessment, judgment, cost, and expense of any kind or character relating to federal or state securities laws, rules, regulations, or orders.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 230, § 26, effective July 15, 2002.

154.20-281.
Dissolution or liquidation of investment fund.

An investment fund may be dissolved or liquidated only after notice to the authority in compliance with any applicable state or federal securities laws or regulations.

This section shall not prohibit an investment fund from making distributions to investors in compliance with any applicable state or federal securities laws or regulations, if the investment fund is in compliance with the terms of KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 230, § 27, effective July 15, 2002.

154.20-283.
Prohibition against certain qualified investments and financial interests — Investment fund manager’s limitations on holding management positions in small businesses in which investment fund has invested.

No qualified investments shall be made in a small business that is the “alter ego” of the investment fund or the investment fund manager. For purposes of this subsection, a business is an “alter ego” of an investment fund or an investment fund manager if any of the following criteria are satisfied:

Prior to an investment fund making a qualified investment in the small business, the small business is owned in whole or in an amount greater than twenty percent (20%) of the small business by an investor, officer, director, partner, member, manager, trustee or employee of the investment fund or the investment fund manager; or

The small business employs on a full-time or part-time basis an investor.

An investment fund manager may occupy any management position in any small business in which that investment fund has made a qualified investment for the purpose of:

Filling a management position in an effort to remedy problems arising from a lack of profitability of the small business, or from dishonesty of the persons otherwise managing the small business; or

Serving in a management position in the small business in order to add value to the investment fund and the business by his or her experience, skills, or relationships to help a business succeed.

No officer, member, or employee of the authority shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any investment fund or investment fund manager.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 230, § 28, effective July 15, 2002.

154.20-284.
Short title for KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284.

KRS 154.20-250 to 154.20-284 shall be known as the Kentucky Investment Fund Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 414, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.